Massachusetts, session 194th, H4657.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the 
licensing authority of the town of Scituate may: (i) convert 1 seasonal license for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises under section 12 of said chapter 138, currently 
issued to Salt Marsh Winery and used at 17 New Driftway to an annual license for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises under said section 12 of said chapter 138 to Salt 
Marsh Winery for use at 17 New Driftway; (ii) convert 1 seasonal license for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises under said section 12 of said chapter 138, 
currently issued to Split Rock Scituate and used at 360 Gannett Road to an annual license for the 
sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises under said section 12 of said chapter 
138 to Split Rock Scituate for use at 360 Gannett Road; and (iii) grant two additional licenses for 
the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to said section 12 of said 
chapter 138 to establishments located within the 3 economic development zones as described in 

of 4 13 subsection (b) upon approval of and under conditions set by the licensing authority of the town 
of Scituate. The licenses shall be subject to all of chapter 138 except section 17.  
(b) The licensing authority of the town of Scituate shall restrict the licenses granted 
pursuant to clause (iii) of subsection (a) to establishments within:  
(1) The Harbor Business District, which for the purposes of this act shall include only the 
“Business Zone” south of Beaver Dam Road and north of First Parish Road and Edward Foster 
Road on the map. Licenses shall be clearly marked “Harbor Business District”.  For the purposes 
of this paragraph, “map” shall mean the map entitled “Harbor Business District – Town of 
Scituate, MA” dated July 1, 2025, prepared by CAI Technologies, a copy of which is on file in 
the office of the town clerk of the town of Scituate; 
(2) The Greenbush Driftway Gateway District, which for the purposes of this act shall 
include only the areas zoned “New Driftway Transit Village – Mandatory Mixed Use District”, 
“Gateway Business”, “Greenbush Village Center”, or “North River Residential” on the map. 
Licenses shall be clearly marked “Greenbush Driftway Gateway District”. For the purposes of 
this paragraph, “map” shall mean the map entitled “Town of Scituate – MBTA Compliance 
Greenbush Driftway Gateway Districts” dated December 12, 2023, a copy of which is on file in 
the office of the town clerk of the town of Scituate; or 
(3) The North Scituate Village, which for the purposes of this act shall include only the 
areas zoned “Mandatory Mixed Use District” or “North Scituate Outer Village” on the map. 
Licenses shall be clearly marked “North Scituate Village”.  For the purposes of this paragraph, 
“map” shall mean the map entitled “Town of Scituate – North Scituate Zoning” dated December 
12, 2023, a copy of which is on file in the office of the town clerk of the town of Scituate.   

of 4 35  (c) The licenses granted under this section shall only be exercised in the dining room of a 
common victualler and such other public rooms or areas as may be deemed reasonable and 
appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing.   
(d) (1) The licensing authority of the town of Scituate shall not approve the transfer of a 
license granted pursuant to clauses (i) or (ii) of subsection (a) to any other location but it may 
grant a license to a new applicant at the same location if the applicant files with the licensing 
authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter from the department of 
unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good standing with those departments 
and that all applicable taxes, fees, and contributions have been paid.  
(2) The licensing authority of the town of Scituate shall not approve the transfer of a 
license granted pursuant to clause (iii) of subsection (a) to a location outside of the initial zoned 
area as described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (b), but it may grant the license to a 
new applicant within such initial zoned area if the applicant files with the local licensing 
authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter from the department of 
unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good standing with those departments 
and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been paid. 
(e) (1) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under clauses (i) or (ii) 
of subsection (a), or any such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be 
returned physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to 
the licensing authority which may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a 
new applicant at the same location and under the same conditions as specified in this section, 
otherwise such license shall dissolve.  

of 4 57  (2) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under clause (iii) of 
subsection (a) or any such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned 
physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the 
licensing authority which may then grant the license to a new applicant in the town’s Harbor 
Business District under the same conditions as specified in this section. 
(f) All licenses granted under this section shall be issued within 3 years after the effective 
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may 
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (d) and (e) thereafter.  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.